Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.080

Submission of charter—Election of officers—Publication.

Within one hundred and eighty days from the date of its first meeting, the charter commission, or a majority thereof, shall frame a charter for the city and submit the charter to the legislative body of the city, which, within five days thereafter shall initiate proceedings for the submission of the proposed charter to the qualified electors of the city at the next general election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days or at a special election to be held for that purpose not less than ninety nor more than one hundred and eighty days after submission of the charter to the legislative body. The legislative body shall cause the proposed charter to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the city at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the electors for their approval. At this election the first officers to serve under the provisions of the proposed charter shall also be elected. If the election is from wards, the division into wards as specified in the proposed charter shall govern; in all other respects the then existing laws relating to such elections shall govern. The notice of election shall specify the objects for which the election is held and shall be given as required by law.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.080.]